Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.090

Contributions by cities—Withdrawal from system.

(1) There shall be paid into the retirement fund by contributions of each city the amounts necessary to pay the following:

(a) Contributions equal to those deposited by employees;

(b) Prior service credits at such rate as may be selected;

(c) That part of a retirement allowance necessary to raise it to a specified minimum;

(d) An equitable share of the administrative costs, all of which costs are to be paid by the cities;

(e) An equitable share of the cost of the death-in-the-line-of-duty benefit, all of which costs are to be paid by the cities.

Any city having in its employ ten or more employees who are members of the system may elect to contribute, in lieu of its contributions set forth in item (a) above, an amount estimated actuarially necessary to match at retirement the accumulated normal contributions of those of its members who will ultimately retire for service or disability; provided that such election shall be made by resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of such city and, in order to become effective for the remainder of the year 1953, shall be made on or before July 1, 1953, and thereafter any election so made shall be made prior to January 1, 1954, to become then effective or prior to January 1st of any succeeding year to become effective on January 1st of such succeeding year.

Any city may, with the approval of the board, further elect to contribute in lieu of its contributions set forth in items (b) and (c) above, an amount estimated actuarially, necessary to amortize over a period of not to exceed thirty years, all liabilities on account of the participation of such a city, which are not covered by the contributions of its employees, its funds on hand and its contributions provided for in item (a) above or the contributions elected to be made in lieu thereof in cases where such city shall have elected to make said contribution in lieu of the contributions required in said item (a); provided that such election shall be made by resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of such city and, in order to become effective for the remainder of the year 1953, shall be made on or before July 1, 1953, and thereafter any election so made shall be made prior to January 1, 1954, to become then effective or prior to January 1st of any succeeding year to become effective on January 1st of such succeeding year.

In the event that any city shall be making either of the lieu contributions as hereinabove set forth, the resulting contributions shall be adjusted to conform with facts and conditions disclosed by each succeeding actuarial valuation.

(2) Payment of the obligation set forth in subsection (1) of this section may be made in advance or may be paid currently as contributions are received from employees and pensions are paid to retired members: PROVIDED, That the share of administrative expense and expense of the death-in-the-line-of-duty benefits shall be paid as soon as funds are available to make such payment and the board shall have the right to require any city that has withdrawn from the system, to annually, at the beginning of each calendar year, deposit and pay in cash an amount estimated by the board to be sufficient to meet the obligation of such city for the ensuing year to those of its members receiving a retirement allowance. From time to time each city may apply reserves in payment of the obligations set forth above as contemplated in RCW 41.44.200.

(3) The board shall furnish each city with an estimate of the amount necessary to pay the obligations of the city in the ensuing fiscal year and the city shall provide therefor in its budget. The board shall cause to be kept an account with each city, crediting the account with such advances and payments as are made by the city and debiting the account with such charges as properly accrue against the city. The board shall furnish each city with a monthly statement of the amount of matching contributions, prior service charges and charges for minimum retirement allowances properly accruing by reason of payment of retirement allowances and deposit of contributions of members.

(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the retirement system shall not be liable for the payment of any retirement allowances or other benefits on account of the employees or retired members of any city under this chapter, for which reserves or guarantees have not been properly set up by such city or its employees to pay such retirement allowances or other benefits: PROVIDED, That nothing herein contained shall be so construed to prevent the establishment of a reserve account for annuities and pensions in which shall be placed at the time of retirement of any member the balances of the retiring member's contribution and the city's matching funds for such member and from which account all annuities and current service pensions shall be paid.

(5) Any city may, by majority vote of its electors, withdraw from participation in the retirement system two years after giving written notice to the board of such action by the electorate. It is hereby specifically provided, however, that the city's obligation to those members receiving or eligible to a retirement allowance prior to such termination of participation shall continue in full force and effect as provided in this chapter. Members not receiving or being eligible to a retirement allowance at time of such termination shall be paid their accumulated contributions on demand. Should it develop that any such city is entitled to a refund such refund shall be made within one year following demand of city entitled thereto.

[ 1953 c 228 s 2; 1951 c 275 s 5; 1949 c 171 s 2; 1947 c 71 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9592-138.]